hu: Formatényező: Alkalmazásalapú vezérlő (hubbal); Fényvezérlő pult (önálló); Rackbe szerelhető vezérlő; USB DMX interfész / hardverkulcs; Falra szerelhető vezérlő; Vezeték nélküli DMX adó / vezérlő; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu dáng phần cứng: Bộ điều khiển qua ứng dụng (kèm trung tâm kết nối); Bảng điều khiển ánh sáng (độc lập); Bộ điều khiển gắn giá đỡ; Giao diện/thiết bị chuyển đổi USB DMX; Bộ điều khiển gắn tường; Bộ điều khiển/Bộ phát DMX không dây; Khác
pl: Współczynnik kształtu: Sterownik z aplikacją (z hubem); Konsola oświetleniowa (wolnostojąca); Sterownik montowany w szafie rack; Interfejs USB DMX / klucz sprzętowy; Sterownik ścienny; Bezprzewodowy nadajnik / sterownik DMX; Inny
da: Formfaktor: App-baseret controller (med hub); Lyspult (standalone); Rackmonteret controller; USB DMX-grænseflade/dongle; Vægmonteret controller; Trådløs DMX-sender/controller; Andet
fi: Muotokerroin: Sovelluspohjainen ohjain (keskittimellä); Valopöytä (itsenäinen); Räkkiasennettava ohjain; USB DMX -liitäntä/-dongle; Seinäasennettava ohjain; Langaton DMX-lähetin/-ohjain; Muu
ru: Формфактор: Контроллер на базе приложения (с хабом); Световой пульт (автономный); Контроллер для монтажа в стойку; USB-DMX интерфейс/аппаратный ключ; Настенный контроллер; Беспроводной DMX-передатчик/контроллер; Другое
sk-SK: Tvar: Ovládač na báze aplikácie (s rozbočovačom); Osvetľovací pult (samostatný); Ovládač do stojana; Rozhranie/kľúč USB DMX; Nástenný ovládač; Bezdrôtový vysielač/ovládač DMX; Iné
nl: Vormfactor: App-gebaseerde controller (met hub); Lichtpaneel (standalone); Rackmount-controller; USB DMX-interface/dongle; Controller voor wandmontage; Draadloze DMX-zender/controller; Overige
es: Factor de forma: Controlador basado en aplicación (con hub); Consola de iluminación (independiente); Controlador de montaje en rack; Interfaz/dongle DMX USB; Controlador de montaje en pared; Controlador/transmisor DMX inalámbrico; Otro
en: Form factor: App-based controller (with hub); Lighting console (standalone); Rackmount controller; USB DMX interface/dongle; Wall-mount controller; Wireless DMX transmitter/controller; Other
pt-BR: Fator de forma: Controlador por aplicativo (com hub); Console de iluminação (autônomo); Controlador montado em rack; Interface/dongle DMX USB; Controlador de montagem na parede; Transmissor/controlador DMX sem fio; Outro
nb: Formfaktor: App-basert kontroller (med hub); Lyskonsoll (frittstående); Rackmontert kontroller; USB DMX-grensesnitt/dongel; Veggmontert kontroller; Trådløs DMX-sender/-kontroller; Annet
bg-BG: Типоразмер: Контролер чрез приложение (с хъб); Светлинен пулт (самостоятелен); Контролер за рак монтаж; USB DMX интерфейс/донгъл; Контролер за стенен монтаж; Безжичен DMX предавател/контролер; Друго
sv: Formfaktor: Appbaserad styrenhet (med hubb); Ljusbord (fristående); Rackmonterad styrenhet; USB DMX-gränssnitt/-dongel; Väggmonterad styrenhet; Trådlös DMX-sändare/-styrenhet; Övrigt
it: Fattore di forma: Controller basato su app (con hub); Console luci (standalone); Controller a rack; Interfaccia/dongle USB DMX; Controller a parete; Trasmettitore/controller DMX wireless; Altro
zh-CN: 外形尺寸: 基于应用的控制器（带集线器）; 灯光控制台（独立）; 机架式控制器; USB DMX 接口/加密狗; 壁挂式控制器; 无线 DMX 发射器/控制器; 其他
ro-RO: Factor de formă: Controler bazat pe aplicație (cu hub); Consolă de lumini (independentă); Controler cu montare în rack; Interfață/dongle USB DMX; Controler cu montare pe perete; Transmițător/controler DMX wireless; Altele
cs: Tvarový faktor: Ovladač v aplikaci (s hubem); Osvětlovací pult (samostatný); Ovladač do racku; USB DMX rozhraní/dongle; Nástěnný ovladač; Bezdrátový DMX vysílač/ovladač; Jiné
hr-HR: Faktor oblika: Upravljač temeljen na aplikaciji (sa čvorištem); Rasvjetni pult (samostalni); Upravljač za montažu u rack; USB DMX sučelje / ključ; Zidni upravljač; Bežični DMX odašiljač/upravljač; Ostalo
pt-PT: Fator de forma: Controlador baseado em aplicação (com hub); Consola de iluminação (autónoma); Controlador de montagem em bastidor; Interface/dongle DMX USB; Controlador de montagem na parede; Transmissor/controlador DMX sem fios; Outro
tr: Biçim faktörü: Uygulama tabanlı kontrolör (hub ile); Işık konsolu (bağımsız); Rafa monte kontrolör; USB DMX arayüzü/dongle; Duvara monte kontrolör; Kablosuz DMX vericisi/kontrolörü; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika: Krmilnik na osnovi aplikacije (z zvezdiščem); Osvetlitvena konzola (samostojna); Krmilnik za vgradnjo v stojalo; Vmesnik/zaščitni ključ USB DMX; Krmilnik za stensko montažo; Brezžični oddajnik/krmilnik DMX; Drugo
ja: フォームファクター: アプリベースコントローラー (ハブ付き); 照明コンソール (スタンドアロン); ラックマウントコントローラー; USB DMX インターフェイス/ドングル; 壁掛けコントローラー; ワイヤレス DMX トランスミッター/コントローラー; その他
ko: 폼 팩터: 앱 기반 컨트롤러(허브 포함); 조명 콘솔(독립형); 랙마운트 컨트롤러; USB DMX 인터페이스/동글; 벽걸이형 컨트롤러; 무선 DMX 송신기/컨트롤러; 기타
fr: Format matériel: Contrôleur basé sur une application (avec hub); Console d'éclairage (autonome); Contrôleur montable en rack; Interface/dongle DMX USB; Contrôleur mural; Émetteur/contrôleur DMX sans fil; Autre
th: ฟอร์มแฟคเตอร์: คอนโทรลเลอร์สั่งการผ่านแอป (พร้อมฮับ); คอนโซลควบคุมไฟ (สแตนด์อโลน); คอนโทรลเลอร์แบบติดแร็ค; อินเทอร์เฟซ/ดองเกิล USB DMX; คอนโทรลเลอร์แบบติดผนัง; ตัวส่งสัญญาณ/ตัวควบคุม DMX ไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
de: Formfaktor: App-basierter Controller (mit Hub); Lichtpult (Standalone); Rackmount-Controller; USB-DMX-Interface/-Dongle; Wandmontierter Controller; Kabelloser DMX-Sender/-Controller; Sonstiges
el: Συντελεστής μορφής: Χειριστήριο μέσω εφαρμογής (με διανομέα); Κονσόλα φωτισμού (αυτόνομη); Χειριστήριο τοποθέτησης σε rack; Διεπαφή/dongle USB DMX; Επιτοίχιο χειριστήριο; Ασύρματος πομπός/χειριστήριο DMX; Άλλο
zh-TW: 外形規格: 以應用程式為基礎的控制器 (含集線器); 燈光控制台 (獨立式); 機架式控制器; USB DMX 介面/硬體鎖; 壁掛式控制器; 無線 DMX 發射器/控制器; 其他
lt-LT: Formos faktorius: Programėle pagrįstas valdiklis (su šakotuvu); Apšvietimo pultas (atskiras); Stelaže montuojamas valdiklis; USB DMX sąsaja / raktas; Ant sienos montuojamas valdiklis; Belaidis DMX siųstuvas / valdiklis; Kita